Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-345] Project agreement. No
special purpose revenue bonds shall be issued unless at the time of issuance
the department shall have entered into a project agreement with respect to the
project for the financing of which the special purpose revenue bonds are to be
issued. Any project agreement entered into by the department shall contain
provisions unconditionally obligating the project party:

(1) To pay to the department during the period or
term of the project agreement, exclusive of any renewal or extension thereof
and whether or not the project is used or occupied by the project party, the
sum or sums, at time or times, and in amounts that will be at least sufficient:

(A) To pay the principal and interest on all
special purpose revenue bonds issued with respect to the project as and when
the same become due, including any premium payable upon any required redemption
of the bonds;

(B) To establish or maintain a reserve, if
any, that may be required by the instrument authorizing or securing the special
purpose revenue bonds;

(C) To pay all fees and expenses, including
the fees and expenses of the paying agents and trustees, incurred in connection
with the special purpose revenue bonds; and

(D) To pay the expenses, direct or indirect,
incurred by the State, as determined by the department, in administering the
bonds or in carrying out the project agreement; and

(2) To operate, maintain, and repair the project as
long as it is used, as provided in the project agreement, and to pay all costs
of the operation, maintenance, and repair.

Moneys received by the department pursuant to
paragraph (1)(D) shall not be, or be deemed to be, revenues of the project and
shall be paid into the general fund of the State. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next